California statutes. Education Code
No assignment to any position classified as an apprentice position shall be allowed to continue beyond the predetermined apprenticeship period approved by the California Apprenticeship Council for the designated trade, except that the school district’s joint apprenticeship committee may approve retention of an employee as an apprentice up to six months beyond the predetermined apprentice period.

Selection of eligibles shall be made in accordance with their position on employment lists established by competitive or qualifying examinations.

The provisions of Section 45134 shall be applicable to apprentice positions, provided that relative age may be considered as a factor in the ranking of candidates for apprentice positions.

Credit for prior training in a
 regularly indentured apprenticeship program shall be given to qualified candidates.

In all cases of apprenticeship probationary periods, the standards of duration and qualifications shall be fixed by the commission insofar as they do not exceed the maximum standards set up by the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades. Termination for cause may be prescribed for any apprentice who fails to attain the predetermined standards of apprenticeship or for causes as prescribed by the rules of the commission.

The commission shall recommend to the governing board a graduated scale of compensation rates for the various levels of apprentices, taking into consideration the percentage relationship to the districts’ journeyman wage of the trade as provided in the
 statement of policies of the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades.

The commission may determine that promotional examinations shall be held for entrance into various levels of apprentice positions and entrance into journeyman positions in a skilled trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

45264.

The commission shall appoint a personnel director within 90 days after the adoption of a merit system from an eligibility list established from a competitive examination given under the auspices of the commission. The commission shall appoint all employees paid from funds budgeted for the support of the commission and shall supervise the activities of those employees that are performed as part of the functions of the commission. Such employees shall be appointed from eligibility lists established pursuant to the provisions of this article, be classified employees of the school district and be accorded all the rights, benefits, and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular service of the district, including representation by the appropriate exclusive representative, if any.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 784, Sec. 5) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 521, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

45265.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45264, the personnel commission, in a school district or a county superintendent of schools office employing 100 or fewer classified employees, may, with the consent of a majority of the classified employees, contract for the services of a qualified personnel director with another school district having the merit (civil service) system, or a city or a county governmental agency if the city or county has a civil service system for the management of its employee personnel.

Such a contract shall be for not more than two years and may be extended, with the approval of a majority of the classified employees, for additional periods not to exceed two years at one time.

If at the end of any contract period the district or county superintendent’s office is employing more than 100 classified employees, the personnel commission shall then comply with the provisions of Section 45264.

A contract approved under the provisions of this section shall become null and void in the event of district reorganization when the provisions of the contract, if continued in force would supersede or be in conflict with the provisions of Sections 45119 or 45120.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45266.

(a) The personnel director shall be responsible to the commission for carrying out all procedures in the administration of the classified personnel in conformity with this article and the rules of the commission, and shall be free of prejudgment or bias in order to ensure the impartiality of the commission. He or she shall also act as secretary of the commission and shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, an annual report which shall be sent by the commission to the governing board.

(b) A personnel director shall not advise or make recommendations to the commission regarding any disciplinary action appealed to the commission under Section 45305, if the personnel director is the party who brought the action against the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

45267.

The provisions of Sections 45123, 45124, 45160, 45198, 45199, 45201, and 45202 are applicable to the employees of school districts which have adopted a merit system pursuant to the procedure set forth in this article.

This section is declaratory of existing law. The sections here enumerated are to be construed and applied in the same manner and with the same effect as when they were applicable to the employees of such school districts prior to the enactment of Section 45100 by Chapter 1267 of the Statutes of 1959, and in accordance with the applicable provisions of this article and the rules of the Personnel Commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45268.

The commission shall recommend to the governing board salary schedules for the classified service. The governing board may approve, amend, or reject these recommendations. No amendment shall be adopted until the commission is first given a reasonable opportunity to make a written statement of the effect the amendments will have upon the principle of like pay for like service. No changes shall operate to disturb the relationship which compensation schedules bear to one another, as the relationship has been established in the classification made by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45269.

Any person who has been continuously employed in a position defined as a position in the classified service for a period of six months immediately preceding the date on which the procedure set forth in this article is adopted shall be deemed to be in the permanent classified service. No layoff or suspension of service during the time when the schools of the district are not in session shall count as an interruption of continuous service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45270.

All persons who have been continuously employed by a school district for less than six months immediately preceding the date on which the procedure set forth in this article is adopted shall be deemed to hold their positions under probationary classification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45271.

Any employee serving in a certificated position whose position is by virtue of change of law or based upon an evaluation made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44065 of the duties of the employee and subject to Section 45285 shall be deemed to be in the classified service shall without examination become a member of the classified service in accordance with the terms of Sections 45269 and 45270. Full seniority rights shall be retained, except that no seniority credit shall be allowed by virtue of previous certificated service in case of layoff for lack of funds or lack of work.

Any employee serving in a classified position whose position is by virtue of change of law deemed to be in the certificated service shall without examination become an employee of the certificated service and shall be deemed to have the necessary certification qualifications for that position. Full seniority rights will be retained, except that no seniority credit will be allowed by virtue of previous classified service in case of layoff for lack of funds or lack of work. Any such person who has been continuously employed in a regular position in the classified service for the length of time necessary to acquire permanency as a certificated employee shall be deemed to be a permanent certificated employee of the district. Any such person serving in a regular position in the classified service for an amount of time less than that deemed to be necessary to acquire permanency as a certificated employee shall be a certificated probationary employee of the district. That regular classified service shall be considered as probationary service toward the attainment of permanency by a certificated employee of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45272.

(a) All vacancies in the classified service shall be filled pursuant to this article and the rules of the commission, from applicants on eligibility lists which, wherever practicable, as determined by the commission, shall be made up from promotional examinations, or appointments may be made by means of transfer, demotion, reinstatement, and reemployment in accordance with the rules of the commission. All applicants for promotional examinations shall have the required amount of service in classes designated by the commission or meet the minimum qualifications of education, training, experience, and length of service, which shall be determined by the commission to be appropriate for the class for which they have applied. Any promotional applicant who has served the required amount of time in a designated class or who meets the minimum qualifications for admission to a promotional examination shall be admitted to the examination. The commission shall place applicants on the eligibility lists in the order of their relative merit as determined by competitive examinations. The final scores of candidates shall be rounded to the nearest whole percent for all eligibles. All eligibles with the same percentage score will be considered as having the same rank. Appointments shall be made from the eligibles having the first three ranks on the list who are ready and willing to accept the position.

(b) Upon the request of a majority of the members of the governing board of a district, the commission may exempt one or more executive secretarial positions from the requirements of this section. Exemptions authorized under this subdivision shall be limited to executive secretarial positions reporting directly to members of the governing board, the district superintendent, or not more than four principal deputies of the district superintendent, or all of these positions.

Any person employed in an exempt executive secretarial position shall continue to be afforded all of the rights, benefits, and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular service of the district, except he or she shall not attain permanent status in an executive secretarial position. Positions of executive secretary shall be filled from an unranked list of eligible employees who have been found to be qualified for the positions as specified by the district superintendent and determined by the personnel commission. Any person whose services in an executive secretarial position are discontinued for a cause other than a cause for disciplinary action specified in this code or in a rule of the commission shall have the right to return to a position in a classification he or she previously occupied or, if that classification no longer exists, in a similar classification, as determined by the commission.

Nothing contained in this section shall authorize the selection of eligible candidates in circumvention of the affirmative action programs of any school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45273.

Examinations shall be administered objectively, and shall consist of test parts that relate to job performance.

For classes of positions deemed by the commission to require an oral examination, the oral examination board shall include at least two members. Where a structured objective examination is to be administered to the entire field of candidates, a single member oral examination board may be utilized. A “structured objective examination” means, for this purpose, an examination for which the examiner exercises no discretion in the selection of the questions or in the evaluation of the answers.

Unless specifically directed to evaluate candidates’ technical knowledge and skills, the oral examination board shall confine itself to evaluating general fitness for employment in the class. When the oral examination board is directed to evaluate technical knowledge and skills, at least two members of the board shall be technically qualified in the specified occupational area. Members of the governing board or personnel commission shall not serve on an oral examination board. A district employee may serve on an oral examination board if he or she is not at the first or second level of supervision over a vacant position in the class for which the examination is held.

The personnel commission shall provide for the proceedings of all oral examinations to be electronically recorded. In no case will an oral examination board be provided with confidential references on employees of the district who are competing in promotional examinations. Scores achieved by the candidate on other parts of the examination shall not be made available to the oral examination board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45274.

Examination records, including any recordings and the rating sheet of each member of the oral board for each candidate, shall be retained by the personnel commission for a period of not less than 90 days after promulgation of an eligibility list. The commission shall prescribe procedures whereby candidates may review and protest any part of an examination. In promotional examinations for classes for which continuous examination procedures have not been authorized, the review and protest period shall be held prior to regular appointment from the eligibility list. Examination records shall not be available to the public or to any person for any purpose not directly connected with the examination and shall be considered confidential but shall, within reasonable time limits, be made available to a candidate or his or her representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45276.

The governing board shall fix the duties of all positions a part of the classified service as required by Section 45109. The board may recommend the minimum educational and work experience requirements for classified positions to the personnel commission. Minimum qualification requirements shall be subject to approval of the commission.

In approving minimum educational and work experience requirements for classified positions, the commission shall insure that such requirements reasonably relate to the duties of the position, as established by the governing board, and that they will admit an adequate field of competition. No requirements may be approved which unduly or unreasonably restrict the field of competition.

The position duties shall be prescribed by the board and qualification requirements for the position class shall be prepared and approved by the commission, required by this section, prior to issuance of an announcement calling for a competitive examination to fill position vacancies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45277.

Appointments may be made from other than the first three ranks of applicants on the eligibility list when the ability to speak, read, or write a language in addition to English or possession of a valid driver’s license is a requirement of the position to be filled. The recruitment bulletin announcing the examination shall indicate the special requirements which may be necessary for filling one or more of the positions in the class. Where such a position is to be filled, using the authority of this section, the appointment shall be made from among the highest three ranks of applicants on the appropriate eligibility list who meet the special requirements and who are ready and willing to accept the position.

If there are insufficient applicants who meet the special requirements, an employee who meets the special requirements may receive provisional appointments which may accumulate to a total of 90 working days. Successive provisional appointments of 90 working days or less each may be made in the absence of an appropriate eligibility list containing applicants who meet the special requirements if the personnel commission finds that the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 45288 have been met. These appointments may continue for the period of the provisional appointment, but may not be additionally extended if certification can later be made from an appropriate eligibility list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

45277.5.

Notwithstanding Section 45277, for the Los Angeles Unified School District, the following shall apply:

(a) An appointment may be made from other than the first three ranks of eligible applicants on the eligibility list if one or more of the following are required for successful job performance of a position to be filled:

(1) The ability to speak, read, or write a language in addition to English.

(2) A valid driver’s license.

(3) Specialized licenses, certifications, knowledge, or ability, as determined by the personnel commission of the school district, that cannot reasonably be acquired during the probationary period.

(4) A specific gender, if it is a bona fide occupational qualification.

(b) The recruitment bulletin announcing the examination shall indicate the special requirements that may be necessary for filling one or more of the positions in the classification. If a position is to be filled using the authority of this section, the appointment shall be made from among the highest three ranks of eligible candidates on the appropriate eligibility
 list who meet the special requirements of the position and who are ready and willing to accept the position.

(c) If there are insufficient applicants who meet the special requirements, an employee who meets the special requirements may receive provisional appointments that may accumulate to a total of 90 working days. Successive provisional appointments of 90 working days or fewer each may be made in the absence of an appropriate eligibility list containing applicants who meet the special requirements if the personnel commission of the school district finds that the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 45288 have been met. These appointments may continue for the period of the provisional appointment, but shall not be additionally extended if certification can later be made from an appropriate eligibility list.

(d) This section applies only to the following classifications:

(1) Principal financial analyst.

(2) Principal administrative analyst.

(3) Senior administrative analyst.

(4) Senior administrative assistant.

(5) Senior financial analyst.

(6) Information technology electronic communications technician.

(7) Senior human resource specialist.

(8) Any
 classifications that have been designated as management or confidential.

(e) The school district that makes an appointment pursuant to this section shall study the effectiveness of the selection method, the vacancy rates for each class, and the length of time to hire for each class, and submit a report on its findings to any affected labor
 union.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 67, Sec. 1.   (AB 1859)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

45278.

(a) Written notices concerning tests, vacancies, transfer opportunities, and other selections of shifts, positions, assignments, classifications, or locations shall be posted at all work locations of employees who may be affected, not later than 15 working days prior to the closing date of filing appropriate applications, together with the normal use of newspapers and bulletins for public notice for open or promotional vacancies. If the subject of those notices affects a probationary or permanent classified employee who will not be reporting at his or her work location during periods when that employee is not normally required to work, including Christmas, Easter, summer recesses, and other paid or unpaid leaves of absences, including vacations, and who has previously requested notification, those notices shall be mailed to the employee. However, the failure of an employee to receive that notice shall not invalidate any procedure, if in fact the notice was placed in the U.S. mail and postage paid.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a school district that publishes and distributes to all work locations examination bulletins at least once each month, provided that records of employee requests for transfer and change of location are maintained and that the names of all candidates for transfer and change of location to a vacancy are certified to the appointing authority along with names of appropriate applicants from employment lists.

(2) A school district may publish and distribute pursuant to paragraph (1) by electronic means.

(c) The personnel commission shall establish procedures for the maintenance of employee requests for transfer, change of location, change of shift, and notification of forthcoming examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 547, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

45279.

A regular employee who is determined by the governing board to be incapable of performing the duties of his class because of illness or injury may, at the discretion of the governing board, be assigned duties which he is capable of performing. The position to which he is assigned shall be subject to classification by the personnel commission, but the employee shall receive no increase in a wage or salary because of his assignment to the position unless he is appointed from an eligibility list resulting from a competitive examination. In the event that the position is classified and allocated to a higher wage or salary than that previously attained by the employee, he may be assigned to the position without competitive examination, but shall continue to receive the wage or salary of his former classification. If the position is classified and allocated to a lower wage or salary than that attained by the employee, he shall be paid the wage or salary appropriate to the position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45280.

The commission shall, by rule, provide for an open competitive examination and a promotional examination to be held at the same time for the position of business manager or for any other single position class which it declares to be at or above the level of business manager. It shall require that all educational and work experience requirements be developed to fit the needs of the position in such a manner that the position will attract competent and qualified applicants from within the classified service, among certificated personnel, or other persons meeting the minimum requirements established for the position.

Such rule shall provide: (a) that all permanent employees of the district, classified and certificated, who meet the established minimum qualifications, shall be eligible to compete in the examination as promotional candidates; (b) that promotional credits, including seniority credits, if any, shall be equally applicable to both classified and certificated promotional candidates; (c) that eligibility lists resulting from such an open competitive and promotional examination shall be merged according to the order of the examination scores into a single eligibility list, after the scores of each candidate on the promotional list have been adjusted for promotional credits, including seniority credits, if any; and (d) that the examination for any such position shall not be construed to be an entrance level position examination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45281.

The commission may by rule provide for the competition of persons employed by the governing board in positions required to have certification qualifications in promotional examinations for positions in the classified service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45283.

In any school district that has geographical boundaries encompassing more than 200 square miles and that divides the area it serves into smaller areas for assignment of classified personnel, the personnel commission may establish area eligibility lists in those areas where the district eligibility list is exhausted. Appointments to positions within the area shall be made from the first three ranks of persons on the area eligibility list, as determined by the commission, who are ready and willing to accept the position. The life of the new area eligibility list shall be not less than one year. The life of the list may be extended for up to an additional period of two years at the discretion of the commission. Seniority for the purpose specified in Section 45308 shall continue to be districtwide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45284.

When an open competitive examination and a promotional examination for a particular class are held at the same time, the commission may prior to the examination authorize certification for employment of candidates from the open competitive eligibility list before the promotional eligibility list has been exhausted if the candidate on the open list has a higher score before adjustment for preferential credits than the score of the highest available candidate on the promotional list after seniority credits have been added.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 535.)
-------------------------------------------

45285.

(a) When all of the positions in a class are reclassified to a higher class, the incumbents of the positions who have been in the class for two or more years may be reclassified with their positions by the personnel commission. When a portion of the positions within a class are reclassified to a higher class, an incumbent who has a continuous employment record of two or more years in one or more of the positions being reclassified may be reclassified with his or her position as provided by personnel commission rule.

(b) The basis for reclassification of the position shall be a gradual accretion of duties and not a sudden change occasioned by a reorganization or the assignment of completely new duties and responsibilities. Determinations as to gradual accretion shall be on the basis of guidelines provided by personnel commission rules.

(c) An employee who has been reclassified with his or her position is ineligible for subsequent reclassification with his or her position for a period of at least two years from the initial action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

45285.5.

No position classification or reclassification plan which would affect classified employees who are represented by a certified or recognized exclusive bargaining representative shall be adopted by the commission until the exclusive bargaining representative and the public school employer of the classified employees who would be affected have been given reasonable notice of the proposed classifications or reclassifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1514, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

45286.

Whenever the appointing power shall require the appointment of a person to a position, the duration of which is not to exceed six months, or, in case of an appointment in lieu of an absent employee, is not to exceed the authorized absence of said employee, the appointing power shall submit a request in which the probable duration of the appointment is stated. Eligibles shall be certified in accordance with their position on the appropriate employment list and their willingness to accept appointment to such position as limited-term employees. Limited-term employees shall be subject to conditions affecting status and tenure during and after employment that the commission may by rule determine. Notwithstanding these limitations on the duration of these positions, the commission may, based on a declaration of an emergency by the President of the United States or the Governor, authorize an extension that may not exceed one year. The duties of the extended position must be related to the emergency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 8.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45287.

When no eligibility list exists for a position in the classified service, an employee may receive provisional appointments which may accumulate to a total of 90 working days. A 90-calendar-day interval shall then elapse during which the person will be ineligible to serve in any full-time provisional capacity. No person shall be employed in provisional capacities under a given governing board for a total of more than 126 working days in any one fiscal year, except that when no one is available on an appropriate eligibility list for a part-time position, as defined in Section 45256, successive 90 working days provisional appointments may be made to the part-time position for a total of more than 126 working days in any one fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45288.

The personnel commission may authorize the extension of a provisional employee’s assignment for a period not to exceed 36 working days provided the following requirements are met:

(a) An examination for the class was completed during the first 90 working days of his provisional assignment.

(b) Evidence satisfactory to the personnel commission is presented indicating: 

(1) That an adequate recruitment effort has been and is being made.

(2) That extension of the provisional assignment is necessary to carry on vital functions of the district.

(3) That the position cannot be satisfactorily filled by use of other employment lists or procedures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45289.

Successive provisional appointments of 90 working days or less each may be made in any class in the absence of an appropriate eligibility list; provided, that continuous examination procedures for the class have been authorized by the commission. Such successive provisional appointments may be made and persons employed in temporary capacities under a given governing board for a total of more than six months in any one year. Such appointments may continue for the length of time for which they were made, but may not be extended if a certification can be made from an appropriate eligibility list. While this section is in effect, it shall supersede any other provisions of this article (commencing at Section 45240) which are in conflict with this section, but only to the extent there is a conflict.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45290.

The appointing power may, to prevent the stoppage of public business when an actual emergency arises and persons on eligibility lists are not immediately available, make appointments for a period not to exceed 15 working days, in accordance with commission rule.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45291.

Combinations of successive eligibility lists may be made during their first year. Eligibles on lists established within the first year of the life of another list may be placed in the order of their relative excellence in the examination on the like list, if lists so merged have been promulgated under conditions and techniques which are sufficiently similar to preserve their competitive character.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45292.

The commission may provide for the continuous examination of applicants for both open and promotional examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45293.

No questions relating to political or religious opinions or affiliations, or relating to any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, shall be asked of any applicant, or any candidate whose name has been certified for appointment, nor shall any discrimination be exercised therefor, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

45294.

“Veteran” as used in this article means any person who has served in the United States armed forces in time of war, or national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, and who has been discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable, proof of which shall be submitted to the commission at the time of the examination.

“Armed forces” means the United States Air Force, Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 3.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45295.

“Disabled veteran” as used in this article means any veteran, as defined in Section 45294, who is currently declared by the United States Veterans Administration to be 10 percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed forces. Proof of disability shall be deemed conclusive if it is of record in the United States Veterans Administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45296.

In the case of all entrance examinations, veterans with 30 days or more of service who become eligible for appointment by attaining the passing mark established for the examination, shall be allowed an additional credit of five points and disabled veterans shall be allowed an additional credit of 10 points, which shall be added to the percentages attained in the examinations by the veterans. Veterans shall be placed on eligible lists and be eligible for appointment in the order and on the basis of the percentages attained by them in examinations after the credit of five points, or 10 points in the case of disabled veterans, is added.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45297.

(a) Whenever, during the absence of an employee of a school district, or student body association operating under Sections 48930 to 48937, inclusive, in the active military service of the United States of America during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, the position held by the employee at the time of his or her entrance into that military service is placed within the classified service of the district and an eligible list is established for the position through competitive examination, the employee shall, at his or her request made within six months after leaving that active military service under honorable conditions, be given forthwith an examination of substantially the same character and scope as the competitive examination through which the original eligibility list was established. The grade secured by the employee in that examination shall be deemed to be the grade he or she would have secured had he or she taken the competitive examination as a veteran, and the employee shall be placed on the original eligibility list accordingly with all the rights and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled had he or she had that place on the original eligibility list at the time of its establishment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any member of the Military Reserve or the National Guard who is called to active duty, either voluntarily or involuntarily, during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, shall be entitled to any rights, in addition to the rights accorded under subdivision (a), that are accorded that member under the federal Veterans’ Reemployment Rights Law or any other applicable provision of federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 303, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45298.

(a) A person laid off because of lack of work or lack of funds shall be eligible
 for reemployment for a period of 39 months
 as follows:

(1) The person’s reemployment shall take preference over new applicants.

(2) The person shall have the right to participate in promotional examinations within the district during the period of 39 months.

(3) If the person is reemployed in a new position and fails to complete the probationary period in the new position, he or she shall be returned to the reemployment list for the remainder of the 39-month period. The remaining time period shall be calculated as the time remaining in the 39-month period as of the date of reemployment.

(b) An employee who takes a
 voluntary
 demotion or a voluntary reduction in assigned time in lieu of layoff or to remain in his or her
 present position rather than be reclassified or reassigned, shall be granted the same rights as persons laid off and shall retain eligibility to be considered for reemployment for an additional period of up to 24 months, provided that the same tests of fitness under which the employee qualified for appointment to the class
 still apply. The personnel commission shall make the determination of the specific period eligibility for reemployment on a class-by-class basis.

(c) An employee who takes a voluntary